Massachusetts, session 194th, H2769.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Subsection (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after paragraph (g) the following
paragraph: (g1/4) A public school teacher who is a member of the teachers’ retirement system, a
regional retirement system, or the Boston retirement system, and who has completed at least 20
years of service may be credited with creditable service for part-time employment as a teacher,
upon their return to full-time service, for the purpose of determining their superannuation
retirement allowance, on a proportionate basis which the board shall determine according to rules
and regulations adopted by the board and approved by the commission. The board shall credit as
full-time service that period of time during which a member performed part-time service as a
public school teacher, not to exceed 5 years. Eligibility for creditable service under this
subsection shall be conditioned upon payment by the member to the retirement system, in an
amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from their regular
of 2

compensation for full time employment, in 1 lump sum or installments, as the board shall
proscribe, together with regular interest.
of 2